Washington statutes.
RCW 7.54.030

Referees.

If the court appoints referees pursuant to chapter 7.52 RCW, each referee, in addition to the requirements and disqualifications applicable to referees in chapter 7.52 RCW, must be disinterested and impartial and not a party to or a participant in the action.

[ 2023 c 6 s 105.]